Alabama, session 2026rs, HB500.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. (a) In Mobile County, beginning with the
terms commencing in 2029, there shall be three constables for
each Alabama House of Representatives district with territory
in the county, to be elected as provided by law. Each
constable shall hold office for four years from the first
Monday after the second Tuesday next after his or her election
and until his or her successor is elected and qualified.
(b) Beginning with the terms commencing in 2029, each
constable must be a qualified elector of the district he or
she represents to be eligible to perform the duties of the
office.
Section 2. This act shall become effective January 1,
2028, contingent on the enactment of a general law authorizing
the alteration of the office of constable by local
legislation.
Page 1

legislation.
HB500 Enrolled










________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Representatives



________________________________________________
President and Presiding Officer of the Senate


House of Representatives

I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and
was passed by the House 31-Mar-26.

John Treadwell
Clerk





Senate 02-Apr-26 Passed



Page 2